incubator/apertium-cv-tr/apertium-cv-tr.tr.lexc
LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!       N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Clitics 
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CLIT

%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} PERS3 ; 
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.

LEXICON CLIT-NOPERS

%+mı%<qst%>:% m%{I%} # ; 
# ;  !! This is the end of word marker.


LEXICON V-PERS-COP

%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>:%>{D%}%{I%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON V-NOPERS-COP

%+i%<cop%>%<pres%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3-FINAL ;
%+i%<cop%>%<past%>:%>{D%}%{I%} PERS3 ;

LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL    ! Includes personal copula suffixes, therefore appears only
                        ! after nominal parts of speech (and only after some cases).
                        ! FIXME: to be checked whether leads to any overgeneration
CLIT ;
V-PERS-COP ;

LEXICON CLIT-NOPERS

CLIT-NOPERS ;
V-NOPERS-COP ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Personal suffixes
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!! FIXME: Move from VERBS here.


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ATTR ! Adjective inflection

CLIT ;
# ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r CASE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CASE-NONOM

%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}n CLIT ;      
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<ins%>:%>%{y%}l%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;     

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC-NONOM

%<px%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}ki%{pN%} CASE-NONOM ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;

CASE-NONOM ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
GENPOSS-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;
!ABE-ETC ;
 
LEXICON CASE 

%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;               
%<gen%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}n CLIT ;      
%<dat%>:%>%{y%}%{A%} CLIT ;   
%<acc%>:%>%{y%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;   
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n CLIT-GENERAL ;  
%<ins%>:%>%{y%}l%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;     

!!!! POSSESSIVES

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC 

%<px%>:%>%{n%}%{I%}ki%{pN%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}ki ATTR-SUBST ;

CASE ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
  
LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n CASE-ETC ;                 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{pN%} CASE-ETC ; 
%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;           
%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;      
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{pN%} CASE-ETC ;  

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSS-REAL ;
CASE-ETC ;
!ABE-ETC ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ; 
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Noun paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON N1 ! Generic noun paradigm.
           ! e.g. ev, kitap, ...

%<n%>: SUBST ; 
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;  
%<n%>%<abe%>:%>s%{I%}z # ;
%<n%>%<abe%>%<subst%>:%>s%{I%}z SUBST ;

LEXICON N2 ! Compound nouns with compulsory possession. 
           ! e.g. dikiş makinası, dikiş makinaları, ...

%<n%>: POSS-REAL ; 
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r POSS-REAL ; 

LEXICON N3 ! Nationalities which can form language, etc.
           ! e.g. turk, turkçe

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON N4 ! Nouns with usage as postpositions. 
           ! We separate these in case they have some different morphotactics.
           ! e.g. arka: arkasına, iç: içinde

%<n%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON N5

%<n%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<n%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON N6 ! Languages which aren't nationalities
           ! e.g. 

%<n%>: SUBST ; 
%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>%<advl%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NP1-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP2-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{pN%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP3-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{pN%} CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP4-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<pl%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON NP1-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP2-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<px3sp%>:%'%{pN%} N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON NP1-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP1-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP1-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<attr%>: # ;



LEXICON NP1-AL

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nun CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:na CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:nu CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:nuki%{pN%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:ndaki ATTR-SUBST ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<com%>:nunla # ;

!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:мондый CASE ;
!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:мондые%{n%} CASE ; ! FIXME CHECK мондый%{I%}%{n%} instead?
!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:мондыйлар CASE ;
!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:мондыйлары%{n%} CASE ;
!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:болай CLIT-GENERAL ;
!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:bu% кадәр CLIT ;
!bu%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:монча CLIT ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:nu%{pN%} CASE ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:nlar CASE-ETC ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:nları%{pN%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NERE

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:%>nin # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:%>ye #  ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:%>yi # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:%>den # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>de # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px%>:%>si CASE ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>deki ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG 

ne:ne PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
neyi:neyi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
niye:niye PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
kim:kim PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"
hangi:hangi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "which"

nere:nere PRON-ITG-NERE ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASE-ETC ;
%<adv%>:ç%{A%} CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:benim CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:bana CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:beni CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:bende CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:benden CLIT ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<px%>:benimki CASE ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:bendeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
ben%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:bence CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:sen CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:senin CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:sana CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:seni CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sende CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:senden CLIT ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<px%>:seninki CASE ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:sendeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
sen%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:sence CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:o CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:onun CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:ona CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:onu CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:onda CLIT ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:onunki CASE ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:ondeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
o%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:once CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:bizim CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:bizi CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:bizdiz CLIT ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<px%>:bizimki CASE ; 
biz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:bizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:siz CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:size CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizde CLIT ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<px%>:sizinki CASE ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:sizdeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
siz%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:sizce CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:onların CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:onları CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<abl%>:onlardan CLIT ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<px%>:onlarınki CASE ; 
onlar%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<loc%>:onlardeki ATTR-SUBST ; 
LEXICON Nouns
tavsiye:tavsiye N1 ; ! "suggestion"
milletvekil:milletvekil N2 ; ! "MP"
teslim:teslim N1 ; ! "delivery"
akaryakıt:akaryakıt N1 ; ! "fuel"
anlam:anlam N1 ; ! "denotation"
azık:azık N1 ; ! "food"
basamak:basamak N1 ; ! "stair"
bilet:bilet N1 ; ! "ticket"
boyun:boyun N1 ; ! "neck"
cıva:cıva N1 ; ! "mercury"
denetim:denetim N1 ; ! "supervision"
doğum:doğum N1 ; ! "birth"
efsane:efsane N1 ; ! "legend"
erzak:erzak N1 ; ! "supply"
finansman:finansman N1 ; ! "finance"
geometri:geometri N1 ; ! "geometry"
gösterge:gösterge N1 ; ! "indicator"
hacim:hacim N1 ; ! "volume"
hatıra:hatıra N1 ; ! "memory"
heyet:heyet N1 ; ! "committee"
hububat:hububat N1 ; ! "cereal"
ırmak:ırmak N1 ; ! "river"
kademe:kademe N1 ; ! "rank"
kayın:kayın N1 ; ! "brother-in-law"
komplo:komplo N1 ; ! "conspiracy"
kürsü:kürsü N1 ; ! "pulpit"
masraf:masraf N1 ; ! "expense"
motor:motor N1 ; ! "motor"
nasır:nasır N1 ; ! "verruca"
yükümlülük:yükümlülük%{v%} N1 ; ! "liability"
yıldönüm:yıldönüm N2 ; ! "anniversary"
demiryol:demiryol N2 ; ! "railway"
havayol:havayol N2 ; ! "airway"
karayol:karayol N2 ; ! "highway"
alt:alt N4 ; ! "base"
yüz:yüz N4 ; ! "face"
arka:arka N4 ; ! "back"
sıra:sıra N4 ; ! "turn"
ara:ara N4 ; ! "space"
taraf:taraf N4 ; ! ""
üst:üst N4 ; ! ""
etraf:etraf N4 ; ! ""
ön:ön N4 ; !
ön:ön N4 ; !
yön:yön N4 ; ! "on"
Türk:Türk N3 ; ! "Turk"
LEXICON ProperNouns
Abhazya:Abhazya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Afganistan:Afganistan NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Almanya:Almanya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Angola:Angola NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Atina:Atina NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Avrupa:Avrupa NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Avustralya:Avustralya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Avusturya:Avusturya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Bangladeş:Bangladeş NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Bişkek:Bişkek NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Bükreş:Bükreş NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Erivan:Erivan NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Frankfurt:Frankfurt NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Gana:Gana NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Hollanda:Hollanda NP1-TOP ; ! ""
İspanya:İspanya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
İtalya:İtalya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Karadağ:Karadağ NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Kenya:Kenya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Kosova:Kosova NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Litvanya:Litvanya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Macaristan:Macaristan NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Makedonya:Makedonya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Moğolistan:Moğolistan NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Podgorica:Podgorica NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Saraybosna:Saraybosna NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Slovenya:Slovenya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Üsküp:Üsküp NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Avrasya:Avrasya NP1-TOP ; ! ""
Barcelona:Barcelona NP1-ORG ; ! ""
Vikipedi:Vikipedi NP1-AL ; ! ""
Ahmet:Ahmet NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Andrei:Andrei NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Dmitry:Dmitry NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
James:James NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Vladimir:Vladimir NP1-ANT-M ; ! ""
Anna:Anna NP1-ANT-F ; ! ""
Putin:Putin NP1-COG-MF ; ! ""
